Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.300

Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the secretary of state by this title, including adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules for the efficient administration of this title.

[ 1989 c 165 s 13.]